Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 85

LOYALTY

Note

L 1994, c 56, §21 purports to amend repealed §§85-33, 38, 47.

PART I.
PERSONAL HISTORY STATEMENTS;

LOYALTY
PROCEEDINGS

§§85-1 to 25 REPEALED. L 1972, c 26,
§1.

PART II.
LOYALTY OATH

§§85-31 to 48 REPEALED. L 1993, c 63,
§1.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next